Illinois, session 104th, SB2340.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 52-3.13b, 10-21.3b, and 34-18.24a as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.13b new)7    Sec. 2-3.13b. Transfer transparency.8    (a) The State Board of Education shall submit an annual 9report available to the public, on or before July 1, on its 10website that includes for each school district:11        (1) the number of students in the school year seeking:12            (A) admission to transfer to or within a school 13        district; or14            (B) withdrawal from a school in the school 15        district under Section 10-21.3a, 10-22.5a, or 34-18.24 16        of this Code, showing the potential net change;17        (2) the number of rejected transfer requests in the 18    school year;19        (3) the reason or reasons why each rejected transfer 20    request was rejected in the school year; and21        (4) the total number of students that either 22    transferred into, out of, or within each school district, 23    showing the actual net change.  SB2340- 2 -LRB104 07572 LNS 17616 b1    (b) Each year, the State Board of Education shall randomly 2select 20 school districts in this State to conduct an audit of 3each school district's approved and denied transfers based on 4the provisions of the policies adopted by the respective 5school district.6    If the State Board of Education finds inaccurate reporting 7of capacity levels in a school district, the State Board of 8Education shall set the capacity for the school district. 9    (105 ILCS 5/10-21.3b new)10    Sec. 10-21.3b. Transfer transparency. 11    (a) On or before the first day of January, April, July, and 12October of each year, it shall be the duty of the 13superintendent of a receiving school district to file with the 14State Board of Education a report showing the total number of 15students granted transfers to or within the receiving school 16district and their respective school sites and grade levels.17    (b) Each school district must report to the State Board of 18Education on or before October 1 of each year:19        (1) the total student capacity for each school in the 20    school district;21        (2) the number of transfer students enrolled in each 22    receiving school in the receiving school district;23        (3) the number of requests for transfer received under 24    Sections 10-21.3a and 10-22.5a of this Code; and25        (4) the number of requests for transfer denied and the   SB2340- 3 -LRB104 07572 LNS 17616 b1    reason or reasons supporting the denial of any request for 2    transfer. 3    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.24a new)4    Sec. 34-18.24a. Transfer transparency. 5    (a) On or before the first day of January, April, July, and 6October of each year, it shall be the duty of the general 7superintendent of schools to file with the State Board of 8Education a report showing the total number of students 9granted transfers to or within the school district and their 10respective school sites and grade levels.11    (b) The school district must report to the State Board of 12Education on or before October 1 of each year:13        (1) the total student capacity for each school in the 14    school district;15        (2) the number of transfer students enrolled in each 16    receiving school in the school district;17        (3) the number of requests for transfer received under 18    Section 34-18.24 of this Code; and19        (4) the number of requests for transfer denied and the 20    reason or reasons supporting the denial of any request for 21    transfer.  SB2340- 4 -LRB104 07572 LNS 17616 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    105 ILCS 5/2-3.13b new4    105 ILCS 5/10-21.3b new5    105 ILCS 5/34-18.24a new